Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-4,148
Commercial drivers' licenses; issuance.

(1) All commercial drivers' licenses shall be issued by the department as provided in sections 60-4,148.01 and 60-4,149. Successful applicants shall pay the fees prescribed in section 60-4,115.

(2) Any person making application to add or remove a class of commercial motor vehicle, any endorsement, or any restriction to or from a previously issued and outstanding commercial driver's license shall pay the fees prescribed in section 60-4,115.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 98;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 854, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 143;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 33;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 24;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 22;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 17;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 43;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 34.